en: Plain pistachios, Pistachios (plain)
nl: Pistachenoten (onbehandeld)

en: Pistachio kernels, Pistachios (shelled), Shelled pistachios
el: Φυστίκια κελυφωτά
es: Pistachos sin cáscara
fr: Pistaches décortiquées
hr: Pistacije u ljusci
hu: Héjas pisztácia, pisztácia héjban
lt: Gliaudytos pistacijos
nl: Gepelde pistachenoten, Pistachenoten (gepeld)
sl: jedrca pistacije

en: Unshelled pistachios, Pistachio Nuts in Shells, Pistachios (unshelled)
fr: Pistaches non décortiquées
nb: Pistasjnøtter med skall
nl: Pistachenoten (met schil), Ongepelde pistachenoten

en: Roasted pistachios, Toasted pistachios, Pistachios (roasted)
bg: Печен Шам-фъстък
de: Geröstete Pistazien
es: Pistachos tostados
et: röstitud ja soolatud pistaatsiapähklid
fi: paahdetut pistaasit
fr: Pistaches grillées
hr: Pečeni pistacije
hu: Pörkölt pisztácia
it: Pistacchi tostati, Pistacchio tostato
lt: Skrudintos pistacijos
nl: Geroosterde pistachenootjes
pt: Pistacios torrados
ru: Жареные фисташки

en: Salted pistachios, Pistachios(salted)
es: Pistachos salados, Pistaches salados
fr: Pistaches salées
hr: Slane pistacije
it: Pistacchi salati
lt: Sūdytos pistacijos
nl: Gezouten pistachenoten, Pistachenoten (gezouten)

en: Unsalted pistachios, Pistachios (unsalted)
bg: Шам-фъстък без сол
fr: Pistaches sans sel
nl: Pistachenoten (ongezouten), Ongezouten pistachios

en: Pistachios (roasted and salted), Roasted and saled pistachios, Pistachio nut grilled salted
fr: Pistache grillée salée

en: Hacked pistachios
es: Pistachos picados
fr: Pistaches hachées

en: Pistachios from Raffadali
it: Pistacchio di Raffadali

en: Pistachios from Bronte
it: Pistacchi di Bronte, Pistacchi verde di Bronte

en: Pistachio butters (100%)
de: Pistazienmus (100%)

en: Brazil nuts, Para nuts
de: Paranüsse
es: Nueces de Brasil, Coquitos, Nueces del Amazonas
fi: parapähkinät
fr: Noix du Brésil, noix brésilienne, noix d'Amazonie, châtaigne du Brésil
hr: Brazilski orasi
it: Noce brasiliana
ja: ブラジルナッツ
la: Bertholletia excelsa
lt: Braziliški riešutai
nl: Paranoten
pt: Castanha do Pará
sv: Paranötter, paranöt

en: Shelled Brazil nuts
es: Nueces de Brasil sin cáscara
fi: Kuoritut parapähkinät
fr: Noix du Brésil décortiquées
hr: Oljušteni brazilski orasi
lt: Gliaudyti Braziliški riešutai
nl: Gepelde paranoten, Paranoten (gepeld)

en: Unshelled Brazil nuts
nl: Ongepelde paranoten, Paranoten (ongepeld)

en: Salted brazil nuts, Brazil nuts (salted)
nl: Gezouten paranoten, Paranoten (gezouten)

en: Unsalted brazil nuts, Brazil nuts (unsalted)
nl: Ongezouten paranoten, Paranoten (ongezouten)

en: Pine nuts, Conifer nuts
bg: Кедрови ядки
de: Pinienkerne
es: Piñones, Piñón
fi: männynsiemenet
fr: Pignons de pin
hr: Pinjolima
it: Pinoli
la: Pinus
nb: Pinjekerner
nl: Pijnboompitten
pt: Pinhões
sv: Pinjenotter

en: Shelled pine nuts, Pine nuts kernels, In shell pine nuts
de: geschälte Pinienkerne
es: Piñones pelados, Piñones mondados, Piñones sin cáscara
fr: Pignons de pin décortiqués
hr: Oljuštene pinjole
it: Pinoli sgusciati
nl: Gepelde pijnboompitten

en: Siberian Pine
la: Pinus Sibirica

en: Korean pine
la: Pinus Koraiensis